Tennessee, session 114, SB2541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-21-111(c), is amended by
deleting the last sentence and substituting instead:
The report is a public document and must be posted on the website of the administrative
office of the courts.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2541
012715
- 1 -